Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 88.
[WILDLIFE CONSERVATION AND MANAGEMENT].

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment, effective December 2, 2010, was proposed by S.J.R. 3 during the 2009 Regular Session and adopted at the 2010 general election by a vote of 612,495 for and 127,444 against.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.

§ 1. [Right to Hunt, Fish, Trap, and Harvest Wildlife]

Citizens of the State of Arkansas have a right to hunt, fish, trap, and harvest wildlife.

The right to hunt, fish, trap, and harvest wildlife shall be subject only to regulations that promote sound wildlife conservation and management and are consistent with Amendment 35 of the Arkansas Constitution.

Public hunting, fishing, and trapping shall be a preferred means of managing and controlling nonthreatened species and citizens may use traditional methods for harvesting wildlife.

Nothing in this amendment shall be construed to alter, repeal, or modify:

Any provision of Amendment 35 to the Arkansas Constitution;

Any common law or statute relating to trespass, private property rights, eminent domain, public ownership of property, or any law concerning firearms unrelated to hunting; or

The sovereign immunity of the State of Arkansas.

Publisher's Notes.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.